Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 5 of this 2024 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS chapter
653.
SECTION 2. Definitions. As used in sections 2 to 5 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Defined time period” means any unit of time measurement equal  to or less than the
duration of an employee’s shift, including but not limited to hours, minutes,  seconds and any
fraction of those units of time.
(2)(a) “Employee” means an employee who is subject  to federal or state laws relating to
minimum wage and overtime and who works at a warehouse distribution center.
(b) “Employee” does not include  a driver or courier to or from a warehouse distribution
center.
(3) “Employer” means a person who directly or indirectly, through an agent or any  other
person, including through the  services of a third-party, temporary services or staffing
agency or any other similar entity, employs or  exercises control over the wages, hours or
working conditions of the employees employed at  a warehouse distribution center of 100 or
more employees at a single warehouse  distribution center or 1,000 or more employees at one
or more warehouse distribution centers in this state.
(4) “Quota” means a work standard under which an employee  is assigned or required to
perform at a specified productivity  or speed, perform a quantified number of tasks or handle
or produce a quantified number of materials, within a defined time  period and under which
the employee may suffer an adverse employment action if they fail to  complete the per-
formance standard.
(5)(a) “Warehouse distribution center” means an establishment  engaged in any services
relating to:
(A) Warehousing and storage, as that term is used in the 2022  North American Industry
Classification System code 493.
(B) Merchant wholesale of durable goods, as those terms are used in the 2022  North
American Industry Classification System code 423.
(C) Merchant  wholesale of nondurable goods, as those terms are used in the 2022 North
American Industry Classification System code 424.
Enrolled House Bill 4127 (HB 4127-B) Page 1
(D) Retailing using electronic shopping and mail-order houses, as those terms are  used
in the 2017 North American Industry Classification System code 454110.
(b) “Warehouse distribution center” does not mean an establishment  engaged in any
services relating to:
(A) Farm product warehousing and storage, as those terms are used in the 2022 North
American Industry Classification System code 493130.
(B) Refrigerated warehousing and storage, as those terms are used in the 2022 North
American Industry Classification System code 493120.
(C) Merchant wholesale of professional medical, dental and  hospital equipment and sup-
plies, as those terms  are used in the 2022 North American Industry Classification System
code 423450.
(D) Merchant wholesale distribution  of drugs and druggists’ sundries, as those terms are
used in the 2022 North American Industry Classification System code 424210.
(E) Couriers and express delivery services, as those terms are  used in the 2022 North
American Industry Classification System code 492110.
(F) Merchant wholesale distribution of carbonated beverages, as those terms  are used in
the 2022 North American Industry Classification System code 424490.
(G) Merchant wholesale distribution of  wine and distilled alcoholic beverages, as those
terms are used in the 2022 North American Industry Classification System code 424820.
(H) Merchant wholesale distribution of beer and ale, as those terms are used in the 2022
North American Industry Classification System code 424810.
(6)(a) “Work speed data”  includes any of the following information that is collected or
maintained by an employer for purposes of  evaluating an employee’s performance regarding
meeting a quota to which the employee is subject:
(A) The quantity of tasks performed;
(B) The quantity of items or materials handled or produced;
(C) The rate or speed at which the employee performs assigned tasks;
(D) Measurements or metrics of  employee performance in relation to an applicable quota;
and
(E) Time categorized as performing tasks or not performing tasks.
(b) “Work speed data” does not include data  or information that does not relate to the
performance of a quota, including but not limited to:
(A) Qualitative performance assessments;
(B) Personnel records; and
(C) Itemized wage statements required under ORS 652.610.
SECTION 3.
Quotas. (1) An employer shall provide  each employee with written doc-
umentation summarizing any quota to which the employee is subject.  The documentation
must include:
(a) The quantified number of tasks to be performed, or  materials to be produced or
handled, within a defined time period; and
(b) A description of the potential consequences,  including any adverse employment
actions, that an employee may face as  a result of the employee’s failure to meet the appli-
cable quota.
(2) The employer shall provide the written documentation required  under subsection (1)
of this section, in the language the employer regularly  uses to communicate with the em-
ployee, as follows:
(a) To a new employee at the time of hire.
(b) To an existing employee within two  business days following the date on which the
employer makes a change to a quota to which the employee is subject.
(c) To an employee when an employer takes an adverse employment action against  the
employee for failing to meet the applicable quota.
Enrolled House Bill 4127 (HB 4127-B) Page 2
(3)(a) An employer may not take an adverse employment action against an  employee for
failing to  meet a quota for which an employee did not receive written documentation re-
quired under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A person who alleges a violation of this  section may file a complaint with the Com-
missioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries in the manner provided by ORS 659A.820.
SECTION 4. Employee right to request. (1) If a  current or former employee of an em-
ployer believes that the employee has been disciplined for failing to meet a quota, the current
or former employee shall have a right, upon request, to receive records as follows:
(a) If the requesting employee  is a current employee, the employee shall have a right to
a copy of a record that includes:
(A) The information described in section 3 (1) of this 2024 Act; and
(B) The employee’s work speed data for  the 90 days immediately preceding the date of
the employee’s request.
(b) If the requesting employee is a former employee, the employee shall have a right to
make one request for a copy of a record that includes:
(A) The information described under section 3 (1) of this 2024 Act related  to the quota
to which the former employee was subject for the 90  days immediately preceding the date
of the employee’s separation from the employer; and
(B) The former  employee’s work speed data for the 90 days immediately preceding the
date of the former employee’s most recent separation from employment.
(2) A former employee has the  right to request records under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion within three years following the date of the employee’s separation from employment.
(3) An employer shall provide records requested pursuant to this  section free of charge
and as soon as practicable upon request of  a current or former employee, but not later than
21 calendar days from the date of the request.
(4) Nothing in this section may obligate an employer:
(a) To impose a quota or monitor work speed data.
(b) To provide  the records described in this section if the employer does not monitor
work speed data.
(5) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries may order an employer  to
produce the records described under this section.
(6) An employer’s failure to  comply with the requirements of this section shall subject
the employer to a civil penalty under ORS 653.256.
SECTION 5.
Effect of collective bargaining agreement. Sections 3 and 4 of this 2024  Act
do not apply to an employer who is subject to a collective bargaining agreement:
(1) Under which employees are  subject to a performance evaluation metric that is subject
to review and negotiation according to the terms of the agreement; and
(2) That provides for rights to request  records that are substantially equivalent to the
rights provided under section 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 6. Nothing in sections 2 to 4 of this 2024 Act  relieves an employer of the obli-
gation to comply with any other provision  of law, including the provisions of ORS chapter
652, 653 or 654.
SECTION 7.  ORS 653.256 is amended to read:
653.256. (1) In addition to  any other penalty provided by law, the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may assess a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000  against any person that
willfully violates ORS 653.025, 653.030, 653.045, 653.050, 653.060, 653.261, 653.265, 653.272,  653.606,
653.611, 653.616, 653.621, 653.626, 653.631 or 653.636 or section 5, chapter  537, Oregon Laws 2015,
or section 4 of this 2024 Act,  or any rule adopted thereunder.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the commissioner may assess a civil  pen-
alty not to exceed $1,000 against any person that intentionally violates ORS 653.077 or  any rule
adopted thereunder.
Enrolled House Bill 4127 (HB 4127-B) Page 3
(3) Civil penalties authorized by this section shall be imposed in the manner provided  in ORS
183.745.
(4)(a) All  sums collected as penalties under this section shall be first applied toward re-
imbursement of costs incurred in determining the violations,  conducting hearings under this section
and addressing and collecting the penalties.
(b) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties  under subsection (1) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner to  the Department of State Lands for the benefit of the
Common School Fund of this state. The  department shall issue a receipt for the money to the com-
missioner.
(c) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties under  subsection (2) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner to the Department of Human Services for the benefit of  the
Breastfeeding Mother Friendly Employer Project. The  department shall issue a receipt for the
moneys to the commissioner.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Bureau of Labor and Industries by section 1, chapter 471, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $234,274 for the purpose of addressing
protections for warehouse employees under sections 3 and 4 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 9.
Section 3 of this 2024 Act becomes operative  30 days after the effective date
of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 10. The section captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only  for the con-
venience of the reader and do not become part of  the statutory law of this state or express
any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4127 (HB 4127-B) Page 4